District of Columbia statutes.
16-522

Traverse of garnishee’s answers; trial of issue; costs and attorney’s fee.

If any garnishee answers to interrogatories that he does not have property or credits of the defendant, or has less than the amount of the plaintiff’s claim, the plaintiff may traverse the answer as to the existence or amount of the property or credits, and the issue thereby made may be tried as provided by section 16-520 . In such a case, where judgment is rendered for the garnishee, the plaintiff shall be adjudged to pay to the garnishee, in addition to the taxed costs, a reasonable attorney’s fee. If the issue is found for the plaintiff, judgment shall be rendered for him in accordance with the finding.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 549, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-522.
1973 Ed., § 16-522.